Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4743
Referral guidelines.

The Department of Health and Human Services and the State Department of Education shall establish guidelines for when a referral shall be made for early intervention services under the Early Intervention Act. The guidelines shall include a request for an individual evaluation of a child suspected of being deaf or hard of hearing as defined in section 79-1118.01.

Laws 2000, LB 950, § 10;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 50;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 597.

Early Intervention Act, see section 43-2501.